Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,246
Advisory committee; duties; termination.

Prior to July 1, 2026, the Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Advisory Committee shall:

(1) Meet not less often than annually as determined by the director. The director may call special meetings of the advisory committee;

(2) Advise the department on proposed rules and regulations relating to the Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Contractors Certification and System Registration Act;

(3) Advise the department on rules and regulations for the siting, layout, operation, and maintenance of private onsite wastewater treatment systems; and

(4) Advise the department on the administration of the act as requested by the director.

This section terminates on July 1, 2026.

Laws 2003, LB 94, § 11;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 59.